Maine, session 132, LD727.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §2902, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2015, c. 329, Pt. A, §3, is
repealed.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §6353, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 1983, c. 661, §8, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §6354, as amended by PL 2003, c. 689, Pt. B, §6 and corrected
by RR 2019, c. 2, Pt. B, §18, is repealed.
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA §6355, as amended by PL 2019, c. 154, §§1 to 3 and affected
by §12, is repealed.
Sec. 5. 20-A MRSA §6358, as amended by PL 2019, c. 154, §4 and corrected by
RR 2019, c. 1, Pt. A, §17, is repealed.
Sec. 6. 20-A MRSA §6359, as amended by PL 2019, c. 154, §§5 to 7 and affected
by §12, is repealed.